Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1020.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706(b)(1) and (1.1) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(b) Disabled veterans.--(1) Any resident disabled veteran who has a disability incurred in any war [or], armed conflict or other period of military service which consists of the loss of one or more limbs, or the loss of the use of one or more limbs, or who is 100% disabled as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and who meets all other qualifications of 1234567891011121314151617 this title and is otherwise mentally and physically fit, shall be issued a free regular hunting or furtaking license upon application to the commission or a county treasurer.(1.1) Any disabled veteran who has a disability incurred in any war [or], armed conflict or other period of military service and possesses a disability rating between 60% and 99% as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and who meets all other qualifications of this act and is otherwise mentally and physically fit shall be issued a resident hunting or furtaking license at the cost of $1 upon application to the commission or a county treasurer.* * *(6) For purposes of this subsection, the term "other period of military service" shall mean training exercises, noncombat military operations, peacetime service activities and other hazardous duty not classified as armed conflict.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1020PN1177 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718